apertium-srd.srd.dix
<pardef n="ten/es__vblex" c="p.42">
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>it</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ides</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ias</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iat</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ìamus</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iamus</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>iais</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ìais</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>iant</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>gei</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>geis</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>geit</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gemus</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>geis</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>geint</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>giamus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giais</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neres</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neret</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neremus</l>   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nereis</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nerent</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giamus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giamus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>tu</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tos</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tas</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="bò/lere__vbsuf" c="p.50">	<!-- según modelo K del curretore ortogràficu con pp específico para bàlere y bòlere -->
  <e>       <p><l>lere</l>      <r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gio</l>       <r><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>gia</l>       <r><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gias</l>      <r><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giat</l>      <r><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giant</l>     <r><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>lidu</l>      <r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lida</l>      <r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lidos</l>     <r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lidas</l>     <r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>giat</l>      <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giant</l>     <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="apartènnere">     <p><l>aparten</l>   <r>apartènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="astènnere">       <p><l>asten</l>     <r>astènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atènnere">        <p><l>aten</l>      <r>atènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cuntènnere">      <p><l>cunten</l>    <r>cuntènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="detènnere">       <p><l>deten</l>     <r>detènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="intertènnere">    <p><l>interten</l>  <r>intertènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mantènnere">      <p><l>manten</l>    <r>mantènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="otènnere">        <p><l>oten</l>      <r>otènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="otènnere"> <p><l>otten</l>     <r>otènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pertènnere">      <p><l>perten</l>    <r>pertènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="retènnere">       <p><l>reten</l>     <r>retènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ritènnere">       <p><l>riten</l>     <r>ritènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sustènnere">      <p><l>susten</l>    <r>sustènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tènnere">         <p><l>ten</l>       <r>tènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tènnere logu">    <p><l>ten</l>       <r>tènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/><p><l><b/>logu</l><r><g><b/>logu</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="tènnere bisòngiu"><p><l>ten</l>       <r>tènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/><p><l><b/>bisòngiu</l><r><g><b/>bisòngiu</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="tènnere in contu"><p><l>ten</l>       <r>tènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>contu</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>contu</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="tratènnere">      <p><l>traten</l>    <r>tratènnere</r></p><par n="ten/es__vblex"/></e>
